New York, session 2025-2026, S6927.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 1202-hh of the tax law, as added by chapter 418 of 2 the laws of 2022, is renumbered section 1202-hh-3. 3 § 2. Section 2 of chapter 418 of the laws of 2022, relating to author- 4 izing the city of Newburgh to impose a hotel and motel tax, is amended 5 to read as follows: 6 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately and shall expire [and be] 7 July 21, 2027, when upon such date the provisions of this act shall be 8 deemed repealed [3 years after such date]. 9 § 3. This act shall take effect immediately; provided, however, that 10 the amendments to section 1202-hh of the tax law made by section one of 11 this act shall not affect the repeal of such section and shall be deemed 12 repealed therewith. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD11138-03-5